Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 5 Dealers’, Manufacturers’, and Rental Licenses

31-5-1.
Definitions.

Whenever the words “licensor” and/or “department” are used in chapters 5 and 5.1 of this title, they shall mean the “department of revenue”.

For the purposes of this section, an electric motorized bicycle as defined in §

31-1-3(g)

is not considered a motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 13; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-1

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 21, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 56, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-2.
Duties of department of revenue.

The department of revenue shall issue the licenses provided for in §§

31-5-5

—

31-5-9

and §

31-5-34

. The department of revenue shall have supervision over the licenses in respect to all the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

and §§

31-5-33

—

31-5-39

, and shall have power to make and to issue rules and regulations to fulfill the purposes of those chapters and to protect public interest. The department shall have power to set from time to time the maximum number of plates to be issued to each dealer after due investigation and after giving due consideration to the number of plates reasonably required for the operation of the business by the dealer. The department shall also have the power to define unfair practices by licensees. All the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, and §§

31-5-33

—

31-5-39

shall be administered by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3367, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-2

; P.L. 1964, ch. 165, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 21, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-2.1.
Motor vehicle dealers license and hearing board.

A board composed of a total of five (5) members, two (2) of which shall be licensed automobile dealers, one new car Rhode Island licensed automobile dealer, and one used car Rhode Island licensed automobile dealer, each to serve a three (3) year term; one active Rhode Island state police officer appointed by the superintendent of Rhode Island state police and shall serve a five (5) year term; one active employee of the Rhode Island department of revenue appointed by the director of revenue shall serve a five (5) year term, and one licensed Rhode Island attorney in good standing shall serve a seven (7) year term. The two (2) automobile dealers and attorney shall be appointed by the governor. The board shall be known as the motor vehicle dealers license and hearing board.

The board shall issue the license provided for in §§

31-5-5

—

31-5-9

and §

31-5-34

. The board shall have supervision over the license with respect to all of the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-39

and shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations to fulfill the purposes of this chapter and to protect the public interest. The board shall have the power to set, from time to time, the maximum number of plates to be issued to each dealer after due investigation and after considering the number of plates reasonably required for the operation of the dealers business, and shall have the power to declare and define what constitutes a licensee. The provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, and §§

31-5-33

—

31-5-39

shall be administered by the board or by any of its duly authorized representatives.

The board shall have all of the same powers, duties, and responsibilities of the previous Rhode Island dealers hearing board established by the director of the department of revenue.

The board shall constitute an agency and shall follow the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 35 of title 42, and its decisions are appealable to the superior court.

A member of the board may be removed for cause by the director of revenue after a hearing conducted by the director determining that cause exists and a written decision explaining the reason for the removal. The director’s decision of removal shall be appealable to the superior court.

The members of the Rhode Island dealers hearing board serving as of August 31, 1993 shall serve out their respective terms of office and will remain on the motor vehicle dealers license and hearing board until their respective terms expire and a subsequent appointment is made by the governor, or respective appointing authority. If a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, an individual shall be appointed according to the procedures set forth in subsection (a) of this section and this individual will serve out the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacancy.

The director of revenue shall provide suitable office space for the board and its personnel to suit the public convenience in all proper way to facilitate the work of the board in carrying out the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

and §§

31-5-33

—

31-5-39

.

Members of the board shall serve without salary, nor shall they be compensated for attendance at board meetings, however, members of the board shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The department of revenue shall provide funds to pay said expenses. Also, the department shall provide legal counsel to the board to defend and enforce the board’s decision and provide legal advice on any matters that may come before the board.

If any section, phrase, clause, sentence or part of this section is declared unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, that invalidity will not affect remaining portions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 60; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 26; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-3, 31-5-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 2; P.L. 1954, ch. 3367, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 2, effective June 7, 1991.

31-5-5.
Dealers’ license required — “Dealer” defined.

No motor vehicle dealer shall engage in business as a dealer in this state without a license for it as provided in §§

31-5-6

—

31-5-10

. Any person, firm, or corporation who sells or acts as a broker with respect to the sale of more than four (4) vehicles in any one calendar year shall be considered a motor vehicle dealer. Any person, firm or corporation who, prior to the retail sale of a motor vehicle, converts, or otherwise assembles, installs, or affixes a body, cab or special equipment to a chassis or who adds to, subtracts from, or modifies a previously assembled or manufactured motor vehicle, shall be considered a motor vehicle dealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-5

; P.L. 1975, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 50, § 1.

31-5-6.
Application for license.

Application for a license shall be made in duplicate to the licensor at the time and in the form and shall contain any information as the licensor shall require, and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

The licensor may require in the application, or otherwise, information relating to:

The applicant’s financial standing;

The applicant’s business integrity;

Whether the applicant has an established place of business and is engaged primarily in the business of buying and selling and servicing motor vehicles;

Whether the applicant is able to properly conduct the business of a “motor vehicle dealer”; and

Any other pertinent information consistent with the safeguarding of public interest in the location in which the applicant proposes to engage in business, all of which may be considered by the licensor in determining whether the grant of the application is in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-6

.

31-5-7.
Duration of license.

Application for license shall be made to the department. Licenses shall be valid, unless sooner revoked or suspended, until December 31st of each year for one year and shall be renewable on or before expiration, upon application and payment of the fee required by this chapter.

Commencing January 1, 2015, licenses shall be valid, unless sooner revoked or suspended, until December 31, 2017, and shall be renewable thereafter every three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-7

; P.L. 1975, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 409, § 1.

31-5-8.
License — Fee.

The license fee for each year shall be as follows: the fee for the license to each motor vehicle dealer shall be three hundred dollars ($300) plus a fee in like amount for each office or branch.

Commencing January 1, 2015, the license fee for the three-year (3) license duration shall be nine hundred dollars ($900) payable in installments of three hundred dollars ($300) per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2959, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-8

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 5; P.L. 1986, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 409, § 1.

31-5-9.
Location specified — Display of license.

The licenses of dealers shall specify the location of the office or branch and must be conspicuously displayed there, and in case the location is changed, an application shall be filed with the licensor requesting the change in location and the permission of the licensor shall be necessary for the change in location.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-9

.

31-5-10.
License required for dealers’ plates.

No motor vehicle dealer, unless licensed in accordance with §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, shall be permitted to register or receive or use dealers’ license plates as limited by the number approved by the department for the dealer.

Whenever the department revokes or suspends a dealer’s license pursuant to §

31-5-11

, or whenever a dealer’s license expires and is not renewed, the department may take possession of the licensee’s dealer’s license, dealer’s license plates, and temporary plates until said licensee is reinstated by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-10

; P.L. 1964, ch. 165, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-11.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

The department may deny an application for a license, or suspend or revoke a license after it has been granted, for the following reasons:

On proof of unfitness of applicant to do business as a motor vehicle dealer.

For any material misstatement by an applicant in an application for a license.

For any willful failure to comply with the provisions of this section or with any rule or regulation promulgated by the department under §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

.

For willfully defrauding any buyer of a motor vehicle.

For any willful failure to perform any written agreement with any buyer of a motor vehicle.

For having made a fraudulent sale, transaction, or repossession.

For any fraudulent misrepresentation, circumvention, or concealment, through whatsoever subterfuge or device, of any of the material particulars of any sale to any buyer of a motor vehicle.

For knowingly permitting any salesperson to sell or exchange, or offer or attempt to sell or exchange, any motor vehicle except for the licensed motor vehicle dealer by whom he or she is employed, or to offer, transfer, or assign any sale or exchange, that he or she may have negotiated, to any other dealer.

For the employment of any fraudulent device, method, or process in connection with the compliance with any requirement under statutes of this state with respect to the retaking of goods under a retail installment contract and the redemption and resale of those goods.

For having indulged in any unconscionable practice relating to business as a motor vehicle dealer.

For having violated any law relating to the sale, distribution, or financing of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 4; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-11

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-12.
Responsibility of licensee for acts of agents.

It shall be sufficient cause for the denial, suspension, or revocation of any license issued under this chapter, that any officer, director, partner, trustee, or agent, including independent salespersons of the licensee, has been found by the department of revenue to have engaged in any conduct, act, or omission which would be cause for refusing, suspending, or revoking a license to that party as an individual.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-12

; P.L. 1986, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-13.
Procedure for suspension or revocation of license.

No license shall be suspended or revoked, except after a hearing in accordance with the administrative procedures act, §§

42-35-1

—

42-35-1

8.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-13

; P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 1.

31-5-14.
Penalties for violations by dealers.

Upon the complaint of the department, any person violating any of the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, shall, upon conviction for the first offense, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or by both a fine and imprisonment. For a second or subsequent conviction, that person shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

If the department shall have reason to believe that any person, firm, corporation, or association is violating the provisions of this chapter, the department may issue its order to the person, firm, corporation, or association commanding them to appear before the department, at a hearing to be held not sooner than ten (10) days nor later than twenty (20) days after issuance of the order, to show cause why the department should not issue an order to the person to cease and desist from violating the provisions of this chapter. The order to show cause may be served on any person, firm, corporation, or association named in it by any person in the same manner that a summons in a civil action may be served, or by mailing a copy of the order to the person at any address at which he or she has done business or at which he or she lives. If at the hearing the department shall be satisfied that the person is in fact violating any provision of this chapter, then the department shall order the person in writing to cease and desist from the violation. All these hearings shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42. If the person shall subsequently fail to comply with the order of the department, the superior court for Providence County shall have jurisdiction upon the complaint of the department to restrain and enjoin the person from violating this chapter.

In addition to the fines described in subsection (a) of this section, the department may impose fines on holders of any license issued by the department pursuant to this chapter of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for violations of any of the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

and §§

31-5-33

—

31-5-39

, or for violation of any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to §

31-5-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-14

; P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-15.
Examination of records — Altered or reset odometers.

The department or its duly authorized representative may inspect the pertinent books, records, letters, and contracts of the licensee relating to any written complaint made against the licensee. If the licensee is found guilty of violating any of the provisions of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

, or any lawful order of the department, the actual cost of each of the examinations shall be paid by the licensee within thirty (30) days after demand for them by the department, and the department may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The department finds that purchasers, when buying motor vehicles, rely heavily on the odometer reading as an index of the condition and value of the vehicle; that purchasers are entitled to rely on the odometer reading as an accurate reflection of the mileage actually traveled by the vehicle; and that an accurate indication of the mileage traveled by a motor vehicle assists the purchaser in determining its safety and reliability. For the protection of purchasers with respect to the sale of motor vehicles having altered or reset odometers, licensed motor vehicle dealers are directly responsible to their retail/wholesale customers to repurchase the motor vehicles bearing altered or reset odometers for the original selling price paid by the customer, or an amount as determined by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-15

; P.L. 1986, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-16.
Complaint to set aside department order.

Any licensee or other person in interest being dissatisfied with the final order of the department, within twenty (20) days after the entry of that order by the department, may file a complaint in the superior court of the state of Rhode Island against the department as respondent to vacate and set aside the order on the ground that the order is unlawful and unreasonable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 7; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-16

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-17.
Witnesses before department — Report of findings.

The department shall have the power in hearings and trials arising under §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-20

to determine the place where the hearing shall be held, to subpoena witnesses, to take depositions of witnesses residing without the state in the manner provided for in civil actions in courts of record, to pay witnesses the fees and the mileage for their attendance as is provided for witnesses in civil actions in courts of record, and to administer oaths. Whenever a hearing or trial shall be held before any authorized representative of the licensor, the representative shall report his or her findings in writing to the licensor which shall then make its ruling and orders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 1953 ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-17

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-17.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 219, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-17.1

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 369, § 2, effective June 24, 1986.

31-5-18.
Records of transactions maintained by dealers.

Every licensee shall maintain a record in form as prescribed by the department of:

Every vehicle of a type subject to registration which is bought, sold, or exchanged by the licensee or received or accepted by the licensee for sale or exchange.

Every new or used exterior part or accessory which is bought or otherwise acquired and every motor vehicle, chassis, or motor vehicle engine which is sold or otherwise disposed of.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-18

; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-18.1.
Inspection of records and premises.

All records kept in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be open to inspection by the department and its duly authorized representatives, by the division of motor vehicles, and by any state or municipal official or police officer during reasonable business hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 10; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-18.2.
Sale of used motor vehicles — Annual reports.

Every licensed dealer shall file with the department an annual report which lists:

The total number of used motor vehicles sold in the previous year by the dealer; and

The total number of used motor vehicles sold without a warranty pursuant to chapter 5.4 of this title.

The licensed dealer shall specify the make, year, and sale price of each used motor vehicle sold without a warranty pursuant to chapter 5.4 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 342, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-18.3.
Sale of all-terrain vehicles (ATV’s).

No motor vehicle dealer licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall sell, lease, or rent any class of all-terrain vehicle to any person under the age of sixteen (16) years.

Violations of this section shall be grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of the dealers license under §

31-5-11

and also be subject to the penalties provided by §

31-5-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 155, § 1.

31-5-19.
Sunday business permitted.

Motor vehicle dealers shall be permitted to have open for the conduct of business any display room or outdoor display lot where motor vehicles are exhibited on the first day of the week, commonly called Sunday, between the hours of 12:00 p.m. and 6:00 p.m.

“Business” as used in this section means the sale of or the attempt to sell motor vehicles. The storage alone of motor vehicles in open lots shall not be held to be displaying for sale purposes, or the use of dealer plates for transporting motor vehicles from one point to another shall not be considered to be for display or sale purposes.

Any person or persons, partnership, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 12; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-19

; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 29, § 1.

31-5-19.1.
Auction of antique and classic motor vehicles.

The provisions of §

31-5-19

shall not apply to an auction of classic motor vehicles or antique motor vehicles as defined in §

31-1-3

. A “classic motor” vehicle means a motor vehicle that is not sold in the normal course of business by a dealer and is determined to be a motor vehicle having some unique or special value as a collectible, as defined by the department. The department shall have the power to license the auctions and provide for any rules and regulations that it shall deem appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-20.
Appropriations for dealer licensing law.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of §§

31-5-1

—

31-5-19

, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of it as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of proper authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 7, § 15; P.L. 1953, ch. 3232, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-20

.

31-5-21.
Manufacturer’s license required.

No manufacturer, factory representative, or distributor shall engage in business as a manufacturer, factory representative, or distributor in this state without a license to do so as provided in §

31-5-22

.

For the purpose of this chapter, each division of a motor vehicle manufacturer or distributor shall be considered a separate manufacturer or distributor for purposes of licensing under this chapter. The department of revenue is empowered to obtain from the Rhode Island superior court for Providence County a restraining order temporarily, preliminarily, and permanently restraining any manufacturer, distributor, or factory representative from engaging in business within this state unless licensed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-21

; P.L. 1960, ch. 155, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-22.
Application for license — Fee — Expiration.

Any person desiring to be licensed as a manufacturer, factory representative, or distributor shall apply to the department of revenue upon a form containing any information that the department shall require. The department may require with the application or, otherwise, information relating to the applicant’s solvency, his or her financial standing, or other pertinent matter commensurate with the safeguarding of the public interest, all of which may be considered by the department in determining the fitness of the applicant to engage in the business for which the applicant desires the license.

Each application of a factory representative shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). Commencing January 1, 2015, the factory representative license fee for the three-year (3) license duration shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and shall be payable in installments of one hundred dollars ($100) per year.

Each application of a manufacturer or distributor shall be accompanied by a fee of three hundred dollars ($300). Commencing January 1, 2015, the manufacturers or distributors license fee for the three-year (3) license duration shall be nine hundred dollars ($900) and shall be payable in installments of three hundred dollars ($300) per year.

All licenses shall be granted or refused within thirty (30) days after the application is filed and shall expire, unless revoked or suspended before that time, on December 31 of the calendar year for which they are granted.

Commencing January 1, 2015, licenses shall be valid, unless sooner revoked or suspended, until December 31, 2017, and shall be renewable thereafter every three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-22

; P.L. 1960, ch. 155, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 299, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 409, § 1.

31-5-23.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

A license may be denied, suspended, or revoked on the following grounds:

Proof of unfitness of the applicant.

Material misstatement by the applicant in his or her application for a license.

Willful failure of the applicant or licensee to comply with any provision of §§

31-5-21

—

31-5-27

, §§

31-5.1-1

—

31-5.1-16

, and/or any rule or regulation promulgated by the department in accordance with §

31-5.1-3

.

Because the applicant or licensee has indulged in any illegal act as determined by the department relating to his or her business.

Because the applicant or licensee has coerced or attempted to coerce any motor vehicle dealer to accept delivery of any motor vehicle or vehicles, parts, or accessories for them, or any other commodities which shall not have been ordered by the dealer.

Because the applicant or licensee has attempted to coerce, or has coerced, any motor vehicle dealer to enter into any agreement with the manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, or representative, as the case may be.

Because the applicant or licensee has unfairly or without due regard to the equities of a motor vehicle dealer, or without just provocation, threatened to cancel the franchise of the motor vehicle dealer.

Because the applicant or licensee has unfairly, or without due regard to the equities of a motor vehicle dealer, or without just provocation, cancelled the franchise of the motor vehicle dealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-23

; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-24.
Denial of license — Hearing.

The department may, without prior notice, deny the application for a license within thirty (30) days of its receipt by written notice to the applicant, stating the grounds for the denial. Upon request by the applicant, whose license shall have been so denied, the department shall set the time and place of a hearing upon a denial, and the department shall conduct the hearing with reasonable promptness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-24

; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-25.
Hearing on suspension or revocation of license.

No license shall be suspended or revoked except after a hearing. The department of revenue shall give the licensee at least five (5) days’ written notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with the reasons for the department’s proposed action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-25

; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-26.
Appeal from the department of revenue.

Any licensee or other person in interest being dissatisfied with an order of the department of revenue may appeal the order to the sixth division of the district court pursuant to the procedure established pursuant to §

42-35-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-26

; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 9; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-27.
Criminal liability for violations.

Any person, being a manufacturer, distributor, or factory representative, who violates any provision of §§

31-5-21

—

31-5-27

, or who does any act enumerated in §

31-5-23

as a ground for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 8, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-5-27

; P.L. 1989, ch. 174, § 1.

31-5-28 — 31-5-32.7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 9, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1963, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 46, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1967, ch. 213, § 2.

31-5-33.
Rental of motor vehicles — Licenses required.

No person, firm, or corporation, whether resident or nonresident, shall, without securing a license, grant a franchise or license, or continue to grant a franchise or license, to any other person, firm, or corporation to use his, her, or its name, trademark, or trade name, whether registered or unregistered, in the business of renting in this state motor vehicles for transportation of persons or property.

No person, firm, or corporation, whether resident or nonresident, shall engage in this state in the business of renting or leasing motor vehicles to any other person, firm, or corporation without securing a license. Any person, firm, or corporation who rents or leases more than five (5) motor vehicles in any one year shall be considered to be engaged in the business of renting or leasing motor vehicles.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, the authority to issue licenses for the rental or leasing of motorized bicycles and/or motorized tricycles in the town of New Shoreham shall be vested exclusively in the town council of the town of New Shoreham, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 19.3 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1984 (S.S.), ch. 457, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 442, § 1.

31-5-34.
Application for license — Fee — Expiration.

Any person, firm, or corporation requiring a license pursuant to this chapter shall apply to the department upon a form specifying any information that the department shall require. The department may require with an application, or otherwise, information relating to the applicant’s solvency, his or her or its financial standing, or any other matter that the department may deem pertinent to safeguard the public interest, all of which may be considered by the department in determining the fitness of the applicant to be licensed pursuant to this chapter. Each application shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100). All licenses shall be granted or refused within thirty (30) days after the application, and shall expire, unless sooner revoked or suspended, on December 31 of the calendar year for which they are granted.

Commencing January 1, 2015, licenses shall be valid, unless sooner revoked or suspended, until December 31, 2017, and shall be renewable thereafter every three (3) years. Commencing January 1, 2015, the license fee for the three-year (3) license duration shall be three hundred dollars ($300) and shall be payable in installments of one hundred dollars ($100) per year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, the authority to issue licenses for the rental or leasing of motorized bicycles and/or motorized tricycles in the town of New Shoreham shall be vested exclusively in the town council of the town of New Shoreham pursuant to the provisions of chapter 19.3 of title 31.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1984 (S.S.), ch. 457, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 409, § 1.

31-5-35.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

A license provided for pursuant to this chapter may be denied, suspended, or revoked on any of the following grounds:

Proof of unfitness of applicant.

Material misstatement of applicant in the application for a license.

Because the applicant or licensee, or any subsidiary or any corporation owned or controlled by the applicant or licensee, has unfairly or without just provocation or cause cancelled or threatened to cancel the franchise or license of an existing or prior holder to use his, her, or its name, trademark, or trade name.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1.

31-5-36.
Denial of license — Hearing.

The department may, without prior notice, deny an application for a license within thirty (30) days of the receipt of an application, by written notice to the applicant stating the grounds for the denial. Upon a request by an applicant who is so denied a license, the department shall set the time and place of a hearing upon the denial and the department shall conduct the hearing with reasonable promptness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-37.
Hearing on suspension or revocation of license.

No license shall be suspended or revoked except after a hearing. The department shall give the licensee at least five (5) days written notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a statement of the grounds for the proposed action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1.

31-5-38.
Certiorari from the department.

Any licensee or other person in interest being dissatisfied with an order of the department of revenue may file a petition for certiorari in the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 5; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 5.

31-5-39.
Criminal liability for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates the provisions of §

31-5-33

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 233, § 1.